District of Columbia statutes.
47-202

Expenditures for school buildings and grounds — Submission of estimates.

A detailed statement of the expenditure of the appropriation made for repairs and improvements to school buildings and grounds and for repairing and renewing heating, plumbing, and ventilating apparatus, and installation of sanitary drinking fountains in buildings not supplied with same, and the taking down, transferring, and the reerection of portable schools shall be submitted with the annual estimates.

History

Mar. 3, 1915, 38 Stat. 910, ch. 80
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-202.
1973 Ed., § 47-202.